Hawaii statutes.
§490:2A-522 Lessee's right to goods on
lessor's insolvency. (a) Subject to subsection (b) and even though the
goods have not been shipped, a lessee who has paid a part or all of the rent
and security for goods identified to a lease contract (section 490:2A-217) on
making and keeping good a tender of any unpaid portion of the rent and security
due under the lease contract may recover the goods identified from the lessor
if the lessor becomes insolvent within ten days after receipt of the first
installment of rent and security.

(b) A lessee acquires the right to recover
goods identified to a lease contract only if they conform to the lease
contract. [L 1991, c 40, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next